New Jersey, session 222, S4456.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section) a.  A school district may issue an alternate diploma to a student who meets the definition of a student with the most significant cognitive disabilities and who participates in the New Jersey Alternate Assessment Program beginning in the 2027-2028 school year.  An alternate diploma shall be standards-based, aligned with the requirements for a State-endorsed diploma, and obtained by the end of the school year in which a student turns 21 years of age. b.    The receipt of an alternate diploma shall not terminate the right of a student with an Individualized Education Program (IEP) for a free appropriate public education under State and federal law until the end of the school year in which the student has reached the age of 21. The IEP team shall determine subsequent courses and services for students who receive an alternate diploma. c.     Students participating in the New Jersey Alternate Assessment Program shall not be precluded from attempting to meet the requirements for receipt of a State-endorsed diploma, and participation in the New Jersey Alternate Assessment Program shall not determine a students educational setting under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. s.1400 et seq. d.    Students who meet the requirements for an alternate diploma may be counted for purposes of calculating and reporting the State adjusted cohort graduation rate. e.     A student may be awarded an alternate diploma upon completion of the following curriculum units or sets of competencies that meet the credit requirements for high school graduation established by the State Board of Education at N.J.A.C.6A:8-5.1et seq.: (1)   Language Arts - four units or sets of competencies based on alternate academic achievement standards to consist of reading literature, reading informational text, writing, speaking and listening, and language in the following courses: (a)   English 1 Alternate; (b)   English 2 Alternate; (c)   English 3 Alternate; and (d)   English 4 Alternate; (2)   Mathematics  three units or sets of competencies based on alternate academic achievement standards to consist of numbers, quantities, algebra, functions and statistics, probability, and geometry in the following courses: (a)   Math Alternate 1; (b)   Math Alternate 2; and (c)   Math Alternate 3; (3)   Science  Three units or sets of competencies based on alternate academic achievement standards to consist of laboratory biology and life science, and other laboratory and inquiry-based science in the following courses: (a)   Science Alternate 1; (b)   Science Alternate 2; and (c)   Science Alternate 3; (4)   Social Studies  Three units or competencies based on alternate academic achievement standards to consist of United States history, United States government, and New Jersey history in the following courses that reflect the provisions of N.J.S.18A:35-1 and N.J.S.18A:35-2: (a)   Social Studies Alternate 1; (b)   Social Studies Alternate 2; and (c)   Social Studies Alternate 3; (5)   Arts  One unit or set of competencies which may include, but is not limited to, courses in visual and performing arts; (6)   World Languages - One unit or set of competencies in world languages or student demonstration of proficiency; (7)   21st Century Life and Careers  One unit or set of competencies in 21st century life and careers, or career technical education; (8)   Financial, Economic Business, and Entrepreneurial Business Literacy  One-half unit in financial, economic, business, and entrepreneurial business literacy; (9)   Technological Literacy  Technological Literacy consistent with the New Jersey Student Learning Standards and integrated throughout the curriculum; and (10) Health, Safety, and Physical Education  Health, safety, and physical education that reflects the provisions of N.J.S.18A:35-5, N.J.S.18A:35-7, and N.J.S.18A:35-8. f.     Courses aligned with the New Jersey Student Learning Standards may used as a substitute for a corresponding course required for an alternate diploma.  Other courses may be substituted as determined by the State Board of Education. g.    The State Board of Education, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section. 2.    Section 2 of P.L.2008, c.19 (C.18A:7C-5.2) is amended to read as follows: 2. a. The board of education of a school district and the board of trustees of a charter school shall permit a student who has been classified as eligible for special education programs and services pursuant to chapter 46 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes and whose individualized education program prescribes continued special education programs beyond the fourth year of high school to participate in commencement ceremonies with his graduating class and to receive a certificate of attendance, or an alternate diploma if the student has met the requirements of subsection e. of section 1 of P.L.   , c.   (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) as applicable, provided that the student has attended four years of high school.  In the case of a student who is pursuing an alternate diploma but has not yet met the requirements for the alternate diploma after four years of high school, the student shall have the option to participate in commencement ceremonies with the students graduating class or with the graduating class of the school year in which the student meets the requirements for the alternate diploma. b.    Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a classified student from receiving a State-endorsed high school diploma when the student satisfactorily completes his individualized education program and has met appropriate graduation requirements. (cf: P.L.2008, c.19, s.2) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first be applicable to the 2027-2028 school year.